Alaska, session 34, SB144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 39.35.410(d) is amended to read: 05 (d) The monthly amount of an occupational disability benefit is 40 percent of 06 the disabled employee's gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to 07 disability. For each month of eligibility after the first 12 months, the monthly 08 benefit amount payable to an employee who is a peace officer or firefighter at the 09 time of termination is increased to 75 percent of the employee's gross monthly 10 compensation at the time of termination. 11 * Sec. 2. AS 39.35.890(d) is amended to read: 12 (d) The monthly amount of an occupational disability benefit is 40 percent of 13 the disabled employee's gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to 14 disability. For each month of eligibility after the first 12 months, the monthly 01 benefit amount payable to an employee who is a peace officer or firefighter at the 02 time of termination is increased to 75 percent of the employee's gross monthly 03 compensation at the time of termination. Notwithstanding AS 39.35.790(b), at the 04 time a member is appointed to disability, the member becomes fully vested in the 05 employer contributions made under AS 39.35.750(a). A disabled member is fully 06 vested in the contributions to the member's individual account made under this 07 subsection. An employee is not entitled to elect distributions from the employee's 08 individual contribution account under AS 39.35.810 while the employee is receiving 09 disability benefits under this section. While an employee is receiving disability 10 benefits, based on the disabled employee's gross monthly compensation at the time of 11 termination due to disability, the employer shall make contributions 12 (1) to the employee's individual account under AS 39.35.730 on behalf 13 of the employee, without deduction from the employee's disability payments; and 14 (2) on behalf of the employee under AS 39.35.750. 15 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.